Washington statutes.
RCW 36.82.060

Federal reimbursement to road fund.

Any funds accruing to any county by way of reimbursement by the federal government for expenditures made from the county road fund of such county for any proper county road purpose shall be credited to and deposited in the county road fund.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.82.060. Prior: 1937 c 187 s 8, part; RRS s 6450-8, part.]